src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: orð
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: orð
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: orði
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: orðs
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: orð
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: orð
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: orðum
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: orða
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: orðið
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: orðið
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: orðinum
    orð+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: orðsins
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: orðini
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: orðini
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: orðunum
    orð+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: orðanna
